Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB801.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.615 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 157.611 to 157.640, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Available local revenue" means the sum of the school building fund account
balance; the bonding potential of the capital outlay and building funds; and the
capital outlay fund account balance on June 30 of odd-numbered years. These
accounts shall be as defined in the manual for Kentucky school financial accounting
systems;
(2) "Board of education" means the governing body of a county school district or an
independent school district;
(3) "Bonds" or "bonds of the commission" means bonds issued by the commission, or
issued by a city, county, or other agency or instrumentality of the Board of
Education, in accordance with KRS Chapter 162, payable as to principal and
interest from rentals received from a board of education or from the department
pursuant to a lease or from contributions from the commission, and constitute
municipal bonds exempt from taxation under the Constitution of the
Commonwealth;
(4) "Department" means the State Department of Education;
(5) "District technology plan" means the plan developed by the local district and the
Department of Education and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education upon
the recommendation of the Council for Education Technology;
(6) "Equivalent tax rate" means the rate which results when the income from all taxes
levied by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Revenue as provided by KRS 160.470;
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
(7) "Kentucky Education Technology System" means the statewide system set forth in
the technology master plan issued by the Kentucky Board of Education with the
recommendation of the Council for Education Technology and approved by the
Legislative Research Commission;
(8) "Lease" or "lease instrument" means a written instrument for the leasing of one (1)
or more school projects executed by the commission as lessor and a board of
education as lessee, or executed by the commission as lessor and the department as
lessee, as the case may be;
(9) "Lease/purchase agreement" means a lease between the school district or the
department and a vendor that includes an option to purchase the technology
equipment or software at the end of the lease period;
(10) "Percentage discount" means the degree to which the commission will participate in
meeting the bond and interest redemption schedule required to amortize bonds
issued by the commission on behalf of a local school district;
(11) "Project" means a defined item of need to construct new facilities or to provide
major renovation of existing facilities which is identified on the priority schedule of
the approved school facilities plan;
(12) "School facilities plan" means the plan developed pursuant to the survey specified
by KRS 157.420 and by administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of
Education;
(13) "Technology master plan" means the long-range plan for the implementation of the
Kentucky Education Technology System as developed by the Council for Education
Technology and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education and the Legislative
Research Commission;
(14) "Traditional school building" means a school building where regular instruction
occurs for the general education of students and does not include facilities that
are solely used to provide specialized instruction or programming to students;
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
(15) "Unmet facilities need" means the total cost of new construction and major
renovation needs as shown by the approved school facilities plan less any available
local revenue;
(16)[(15)] "Unmet technology need" means the total cost of technology need as shown
by the approved technology plan of the local district; and
(17)[(16)] "Eligible district" means any local school district having an unmet facilities
need, as defined in this section, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) or a district qualifying for education technology funding.
Section 2. KRS 157.621 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the levy required by KRS 157.440(1)(b) to participate in the Facilities
Support Program of Kentucky, local school districts that have made the levy
required by KRS 157.440(1)(b) are authorized to levy the following additional
equivalent rates to support debt service, new facilities, or major renovations of
existing school facilities, which levies shall not be subject to recall under any
provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, or to voter approval under the
provisions of KRS 157.440(2):
(a) 1. Prior to April 24, 2008, local school districts that have experienced
student population growth during a five (5) year period may levy an
additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate for debt service and new
facilities. The tax rate levied by the district under this provision shall not
be equalized by state funding, except as provided in paragraph (b) of
this subsection. Any levy imposed under this paragraph prior to April
24, 2008, by a local school district shall continue until removed by the
local school district.
2. A local school district shall meet the following criteria in order to levy
the tax provided in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph:
a. Growth of at least one hundred fifty (150) students in average
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
daily attendance and three percent (3%) overall growth for the five
(5) preceding years;
b. Bonded debt to the maximum capability of at least eighty percent
(80%) of capital outlay from the Support Education Excellence in
Kentucky funding program, all revenue from the local facility tax,
and all receipts from state equalization on the local facility tax;
c. Current student enrollment in excess of available classroom space;
and
d. A local school facility plan that has been approved by the
Kentucky Board of Education and certified to the School Facilities
Construction Commission;
(b) 1. In addition to the levy authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
local school district may levy an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent
rate under the same terms and conditions established by paragraph (a) of
this subsection beginning in fiscal year 2003-2004 if the levy was made
prior to April 24, 2008, and if the local school district:
a. Levied the five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate authorized by
paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
b. Still meets the requirements established by paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection.
2. Any school district that imposes both the levy authorized by paragraph
(a) of this subsection and the additional levy authorized by subparagraph
1. of this paragraph shall receive equalization funding from the state for
the levy imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection beginning in fiscal
year 2003-2004. Equalization shall be provided at one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment, subject to
the provision of funding by the General Assembly. Equalization funds
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
shall be used as provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b).
3. Any levy imposed under this paragraph prior to April 24, 2008, by a
local school district shall continue until removed by the local school
district; and
(c) 1. A local school district that meets the following conditions may levy an
additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate on and after April 24, 2008:
a. The local school district is located in a county that will have more
students as a direct result of the new mission established for Fort
Knox by the Base Realignment and Closure (BRAC) 2005 issued
by the United States Department of Defense pursuant to the
Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990, Pub. L. No.
100-526, Part A of Title XXIX of 104 Stat. 1808, 10 U.S.C. sec.
2687 note; and
b. The commissioner of education has determined, based upon the
presentation of credible data, that the projected increased number
of students is sufficient to require new facilities or the major
renovation of existing facilities to accommodate the new students,
and has approved the imposition of the additional levy.
2. Any local school district that imposes both the levy authorized by
paragraph (a) of this subsection and the additional levy authorized by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, and that has not received equalization
funding under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, shall receive
equalization funding from the state for the levy imposed by paragraph
(a) of this subsection beginning in the fiscal year following the fiscal
year in which the levy authorized by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph
is imposed. Equalization shall be provided at one hundred fifty percent
(150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment, subject to the
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
provision of funding by the General Assembly. Equalization funds shall
be used as provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b).
3. Any levy imposed under this paragraph by a local school district shall
continue until removed by the local school district.
(d) 1. A local school district may levy an additional five cents ($0.05)
equivalent rate beginning August 1, 2026, that shall not be subject to
recall, if the local school district:
a. Either has a:
i. Local school facility plan under this section as of
December 31, 2025, that contains a traditional school
building designated as a transitional center under KRS
157.420 and the plan indicates the consolidation of that
traditional school building into another school; or
ii. Traditional school building with an average daily
attendance of fewer than one hundred fifty (150) students
for at least three (3) consecutive years and has complied
with subsection (3) of Section 3 of this Act by either
submitting a school facility plan that closes and
consolidates that traditional school building with another
facility or modifying the district's attendance areas to raise
that traditional school building's average daily attendance
above two hundred (200) students;
b. Has not authorized more than two (2) of the levies established
under:
i. Subsection (1)(a) of this section;
ii. Subsection (1)(b) of this section;
iii. Subsection (1)(c) of this section;
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
iv. Subsection (2) of this section; or
v. KRS 157.440(1)(b); and
c. Has insufficient bonding capacity to either:
i. Improve the facility into which the traditional school
building will be consolidated under subparagraph a.i. of
this paragraph; or
ii. Improve the facility or facilities necessary to carry out
subparagraph a.ii. of this paragraph.
2. A local school district that has authorized the levy in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph may levy an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent
rate that shall not be subject to recall beginning August 1, 2027, if the
local board of education adopts a resolution determining that the levy
raised under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph is insufficient to:
a. Improve the facility into which the traditional school building
will be consolidated under subparagraph 1.a.i. of this paragraph;
or
b. Improve the facility or facilities necessary to carry out
subparagraph 1.a.ii. of this paragraph.
3. Any levy established under subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph
shall expire after twenty-five (25) years.
4. Any levies authorized by subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph
shall receive equalization funding from the state. Equalization shall be
provided at one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the statewide average
per pupil assessment, subject to the provision of funding by the
General Assembly. Equalization funds shall be used as provided in
KRS 157.440(1)(b).
5. Equalization provided under subparagraph 4. of this paragraph shall
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
be suspended for a school district if, after five (5) years from the
substantial completion of renovation or construction of a new
traditional school building, the school district has failed to consolidate
and close the existing traditional school building or modify the
district's attendance areas to raise the existing traditional school
building's average daily attendance above two hundred (200) students.
The suspension of equalization shall continue until the failure is
corrected.
(2) (a) Any local school district that, prior to April 27, 2016, levied an equivalent rate
that:
1. Was subject to recall at the time it was levied; and
2. Included a rate of at least five cents ($0.05) equivalent rate for the
purpose of debt service for school construction or major renovation of
existing school facilities;
shall be eligible for retroactive equalization from the state for that levy at one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment
beginning in fiscal year 2003-2004, subject to the fiscal condition of the
Commonwealth and the provision of funding by the General Assembly.
Equalization funds shall be used as provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b).
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that for levies described in this
subsection that are imposed on or after April 27, 2016, equalization funds, if
provided by the General Assembly, shall terminate upon the earlier of June
30, 2038, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this
equalization funding are retired. Equalization shall be subject to the fiscal
condition of the Commonwealth and the provision of funding by the General
Assembly.
(3) Any local school district that:
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
(a) Levied an equivalent tax rate as of April 24, 2008, that included at least ten
cents ($0.10) that was devoted to building purposes, or that had debt service
corresponding to a ten cents ($0.10) equivalent rate;
(b) Did not receive equalized growth funding pursuant to subsection (1)(b)2. of
this section; and
(c) Has been approved by the commissioner of education;
shall be eligible for equalization from the state for that levy at one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment beginning in fiscal
year 2005-2006, subject to the provision of funding by the General Assembly.
Equalization funds shall be used as provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b). Equalization
funds shall be available to a local school district pursuant to this subsection until the
earlier of June 30, 2038, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported
by this equalization funding are retired.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any local school district
receiving equalization funding prior to April 27, 2016, related to an equivalent
rate levy described in subsection (1), (2), (3), or (5) of this section shall
continue to receive the equalization funding related to the applicable
equivalent rate levy, subject to the limitations established by subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (5) of this section, and subject to the fiscal condition of the
Commonwealth and the provision of funding by the General Assembly, until
amended by subsequent action of the General Assembly. A local school
district described in this paragraph shall not be eligible to receive equalization
for any additional equivalent rate levies made by it on or after April 27, 2016.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any local school district
that has imposed an equivalent rate levy described in subsection (1)(a) or (b)
or (2) of this section prior to April 27, 2016, that qualifies for equalization but
that has not yet received equalization funding shall be eligible for equalization
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
funding as provided in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (2) of this section, subject to
the provision of funding by the General Assembly.
(c) On and after April 24, 2008, a local school district not included in paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection shall be prohibited from imposing an equivalent
rate levy under the provisions of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, and
shall not be eligible for equalization funding under the provisions of this
section.
(d) On and after April 24, 2008, a local school district meeting the requirements
of subsection (1)(c) of this section may impose the levy authorized by
subsection (1)(c) of this section, and shall qualify for equalization as provided
in subsection (1)(c) of this section, subject to the provision of funding by the
General Assembly.
(5) (a) Any local school district that:
1. Had school facilities classified as Category 5 on May 18, 2010, by the
Kentucky Department of Education; and
2. Levied an additional five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate prior to April
27, 2016, for debt service, new construction, and major renovation
beyond the five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate required by KRS
157.440(1)(b), except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
shall be eligible for equalization from the state for that levy at one hundred
fifty percent (150%) of the statewide average per pupil assessment beginning
in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the levy was imposed.
This levy shall be subject to the recall provisions of KRS 132.017.
(b) School districts that levied a five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate for debt
service, new construction, and major renovation, beyond the rate required by
KRS 157.440(1)(b) prior to May 18, 2010, shall not be required to levy an
additional tax to receive the equalization funds provided in paragraph (a) of
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
this subsection.
(c) Any local school district receiving equalization under this subsection shall
receive full calculated equalization until the earlier of twenty (20) years
after the effective date of this Act, or the date the bonds for the local school
district supported by this equalization are retired[If the school district
utilizes the equalization funds to support a bond issue for construction
purposes, equalization funds shall be provided until the earlier of twenty (20)
years or date the bonds are retired].
(d) In the event that a school district receives funding pursuant to this subsection
to support construction of a new school facility and subsequently, as a result
of litigation, receives funding for the same facility for which state funds were
provided, that school district shall reimburse the Commonwealth an amount
equal to the amount provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Any
funds received in this manner shall be deposited in the budget reserve trust
fund account established in KRS 48.705.
Section 3. KRS 160.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each board of education shall have general control and management of the public
schools in its district and may establish schools and provide for courses and other
services as it deems necessary for the promotion of education and the general health
and welfare of pupils, consistent with the administrative regulations of the
Kentucky Board of Education. Each board shall have control and management of
all school funds and all public school property of its district and may use its funds
and property to promote public education. Each board shall exercise generally all
powers prescribed by law in the administration of its public school system, appoint
the superintendent of schools, and fix the compensation of employees.
(2) Each board shall make and adopt, and may amend or repeal, rules, regulations, and
bylaws for its meetings and proceedings for the management of the schools and
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
school property of the district, for the transaction of its business, and for the
qualification and duties of employees and the conduct of pupils. The rules,
regulations, and bylaws made by a board of education shall be consistent with the
general school laws of the state and shall be binding on the board of education and
parties dealing with it until amended or repealed by an affirmative vote of a
majority of the members of the board. The rules, regulations, and bylaws shall be
spread on the minutes of the board and be open to the public. The rules, regulations,
and bylaws may include the use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS 45A.070 in
the procurement of goods and leases.
(3) A board that maintains a traditional school building as defined in Section 1 of
this Act with an average daily attendance of fewer than one hundred fifty (150)
students for at least three (3) consecutive years shall, at the next required revision
of the school facility plan:
(a) Submit a school facility plan under Section 2 of this Act that closes and
consolidates that traditional school building with another facility; or
(b) Modify the district's attendance areas to raise that traditional school
building's average daily attendance above two hundred (200) students.
(4) Local boards of education electing to enter into agreements pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act, KRS 65.210 to 65.300, with other local boards of
education to establish consortia to provide services in accordance with the
Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990 Ky. Acts Ch. 476, may transfer real
or personal property to the consortia without receiving fair market value
compensation. The joint or cooperative action may employ employees transferred
from employment of a local board of education, and the employees shall retain their
eligibility for the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System. The chief state school
officer, under administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, may
allot funding to an interlocal cooperative board created by two (2) or more local
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1052
school districts pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to provide educational services
for the mutual advantage of the students in the representative districts. All statutes
and administrative regulations that apply to the use of these funds in local school
districts shall also apply to cooperative boards.
Section 4. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$3,500,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the Support Education
Excellence in Kentucky (SEEK) program budget unit to be distributed to school districts
for the equalization of taxes levied under subsection (1)(d) of Section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. Whereas it is critical to ensure that Kentucky school districts can
efficiently reorganize the schools operating within the districts in the next fiscal year, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:13 PM Jacketed